Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-108
Department heads; restrictions on office holding or employment; exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no head of any department referred to in section 81-101 shall hold any other public office or receive any profit from any other public or private employment. For purposes of this section, employment shall not be interpreted to mean membership on the board of directors of any corporation, business, or association, whether or not the head of the department receives compensation for such membership.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as prohibiting the head of one of the departments referred to in section 81-101 from serving:

(a) On any public advisory or policymaking board, commission, committee, or council; or

(b) As a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 6, p. 438;

C.S.1922, § 7247;

C.S.1929, § 81-109;

R.S.1943, § 81-108;

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 3, p. 1101;

Laws 1955, c. 329, § 5, p. 1027;

Laws 1959, c. 424, § 2, p. 1423;

Laws 1981, LB 249, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 82, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 852, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB322, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB731, § 1.